Utah statutes.
53B-15-102.   Collection of defaulted student loan from public employee.

If a National Direct Student Loan or a student loan made to a public employee under Title 53B is delinquent or in default, the state college, university, or board responsible for collection of the loan may proceed under this chapter to collect the loan.

